adj.twol
Alphabet а б в г д е и й л р с у х ч щ ъ I А Б В Г Д Е И Й Л Р С У Х Ч Щ Ъ 0 %>:0 л:0 ъ:0 Л:0 Ъ:0 ;

Rules

"genetive degimination 1"
л:0 <=> _ ъ:0 л ъ и %>:0 л ъ и ;

"genetive degimination 2"
ъ:0 <=> л:0 _ л ъ и %>:0 л ъ и ;

"drop morpheme boundary"
%>:0 <=> _ ;
